District of Columbia statutes.
42-3230

Grant or assignment of reversion of premises or by lessee not to affect rights or duties under lease.

The grantee or assignee of the reversion of any leased premises shall have the same right of action against the lessee, his personal representatives, heirs, or assigns, for rent or for any forfeiture or breach of any covenant or condition in the lease which the grantor or assignor might have had; and the assignee of the lessee shall have the same rights of action against the lessor, his grantee, or assignee, upon any covenants in the lease which the lessee might have had against the lessor.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1384, ch. 854, § 1234
1981 Ed., § 45-1430.
1973 Ed., § 45-932.